Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4415
Child welfare system; work group; consultant; submit practice and finance model framework.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall contract with an outside consultant with expertise in child welfare system transformation by December 15, 2022. The consultant shall assist the work group with the development of a written framework for the practice and finance model.

(2) On or before December 1, 2023, the work group shall electronically submit the written practice and finance model framework to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 5.